Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 17
PENALTIES AND PROCEDURE

42-4-1701. Traffic offenses and infractions classified - penalties - penalty and surcharge schedule - repeal.

It is a traffic infraction for any person to violate any of the provisions of articles 1 to 3 of this title and parts 1 to 3 and 5 to 19 of this article unless such violation is, by articles 1 to 3 of this title and parts 1 to 3 and 5 to 19 of this article or by any other law of this state, declared to be a felony, misdemeanor, petty offense, or misdemeanor traffic offense. Such a traffic infraction shall constitute a civil matter.

For the purposes of this part 17, "judge" shall include any county court magistrate who hears traffic infraction matters, but no person charged with a traffic violation other than a traffic infraction or class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense shall be taken before a county court magistrate.

For the purposes of this part 17, "magistrate" shall include any county court judge who is acting as a county court magistrate in traffic infraction and class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense matters.

Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section or the section creating the infraction, traffic infractions are divided into two classes which shall be subject to the following penalties which are authorized upon entry of judgment against the defendant:
(3) (a) (I) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section or the section creating the infraction, traffic infractions are divided into two classes which shall be subject to the following penalties which are authorized upon entry of judgment against the defendant:

Except as otherwise provided in sub-subparagraph (B) of this subparagraph (II), subsections (4) and (5) of this section, and sections 42-4-1301.3, 42-4-1301.4, and 42-4-1307, or the section creating the offense, misdemeanor traffic offenses are divided into two classes that are distinguished from one another by the following penalties that are authorized upon conviction:

Any person convicted of a class 1 or class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense shall be required to pay restitution as required by article 18.5 of title 16, C.R.S., and may be sentenced to perform a certain number of hours of community or useful public service in addition to any other sentence provided by sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (II), subject to the conditions and restrictions of section 18-1.3-507, C.R.S.

Any traffic infraction or misdemeanor traffic offense defined by law outside of articles 1 to 4 of this title shall be punishable as provided in the statute defining it or as otherwise provided by law.

The department has no authority to assess any points under section 42-2-127 upon entry of judgment for any class B traffic infractions.

Except as provided in subsection (5)(c) of this section, every person who is convicted of, who admits liability for, or against whom a judgment is entered for a violation of this title 42 to which subsection (5)(a) or (5)(b) of this section applies shall be fined or penalized and have a surcharge levied in accordance with sections 24-4.1-119 (1)(f) and 24-4.2-104 (1)(b)(I), in accordance with the penalty and surcharge schedule set forth in subsections (4)(a)(I)(A) to (4)(a)(I)(P) of this section; or, if no penalty or surcharge is specified in the schedule, the penalty for class A and class B traffic infractions is fifteen dollars, and the surcharge is four dollars. These penalties and surcharges apply whether the defendant acknowledges the defendant's guilt or liability in accordance with the procedure set forth by subsection (5)(a) of this section, is found guilty by a court of competent jurisdiction, or has judgment entered against the defendant by a county court magistrate. Penalties and surcharges for violating specific sections are as follows:
(4) (a) (I) Except as provided in subsection (5)(c) of this section, every person who is convicted of, who admits liability for, or against whom a judgment is entered for a violation of this title 42 to which subsection (5)(a) or (5)(b) of this section applies shall be fined or penalized and have a surcharge levied in accordance with sections 24-4.1-119 (1)(f) and 24-4.2-104 (1)(b)(I), in accordance with the penalty and surcharge schedule set forth in subsections (4)(a)(I)(A) to (4)(a)(I)(P) of this section; or, if no penalty or surcharge is specified in the schedule, the penalty for class A and class B traffic infractions is fifteen dollars, and the surcharge is four dollars. These penalties and surcharges apply whether the defendant acknowledges the defendant's guilt or liability in accordance with the procedure set forth by subsection (5)(a) of this section, is found guilty by a court of competent jurisdiction, or has judgment entered against the defendant by a county court magistrate. Penalties and surcharges for violating specific sections are as follows:

A person convicted of violating section 42-4-507 or 42-4-508 shall be fined pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (A), whether the defendant acknowledges the defendant's guilt pursuant to the procedure set forth in paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of this section or is found guilty by a court of competent jurisdiction. A person who violates section 42-4-507 or 42-4-508 shall be punished by the following fine plus a surcharge of sixteen percent of the fine:

The state, county, city, or city and county issuing a citation that results in the assessment of the penalties in sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (II) may retain and distribute the following amount of the penalty according to the law of the jurisdiction that assesses the penalty, but the remainder of the penalty shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the moneys to the commercial vehicle enterprise tax fund created in section 42-1-225:

Any person convicted of violating any of the rules promulgated pursuant to section 42-4-510, except section 42-4-510 (2)(b)(IV), shall be fined as follows, whether the violator acknowledges the violator's guilt pursuant to the procedure set forth in paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of this section or is found guilty by a court of competent jurisdiction:

Except as provided in sub-subparagraph (D) of this subparagraph (III), any person who violates the maximum permitted weight on an axle or on gross weight shall be punished by the following fine plus a surcharge of sixteen percent of the fine:

Any person who violates any of the requirements of the rules and regulations pertaining to transport permits for the movement of overweight or oversize vehicles or loads, other than those violations specified in sub-subparagraph (A) or (C) of this subparagraph (III), shall be punished by a fine of fifty dollars.

Any person who fails to have an escort vehicle when such vehicle is required by the rules and regulations pertaining to transport permits for the movement of overweight or oversize vehicles or loads or who fails to reduce speed when such speed reduction is required by said rules and regulations shall be punished by a fine of two hundred fifty dollars.

The fines for a person who violates the maximum permitted weight on an axle or on gross weight under a permit issued pursuant to section 42-4-510 (1)(b)(II) shall be doubled.

Any person convicted of violating section 42-3-114 who has not been convicted of a violation of section 42-3-114 in the twelve months preceding such conviction shall be fined as follows, whether the defendant acknowledges the defendant's guilt pursuant to the procedure set forth in paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of this section or is found guilty by a court of competent jurisdiction:

Any person convicted of violating section 42-3-114 who has been convicted of violating said section within the twelve months preceding such conviction shall be fined pursuant to subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of this section.

Any person convicted of violating section 42-20-204 (2) shall be fined twenty-five dollars, whether the violator acknowledges guilt pursuant to the procedure set forth in paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of this section or is found guilty by a court of competent jurisdiction.

Except as provided in paragraph (c) of subsection (5) of this section, every person who is convicted of, who admits liability for, or against whom a judgment is entered for a violation of any provision of this title to which the provisions of paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection (5) of this section apply, shall, in addition to any other fine or penalty or surcharge, be assessed a surcharge of one dollar, which amount shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the family-friendly court program cash fund created in section 13-3-113 (6), C.R.S. This surcharge shall apply whether the defendant acknowledges the defendant's guilt or liability in accordance with the procedure set forth by paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of this section or is found guilty by a court of competent jurisdiction or has judgment entered against the defendant by a county court magistrate.

Repealed.

The penalties and surcharges for a second or subsequent violation of section 42-20-109 (2) within twelve months shall be doubled.

A person who violates section 42-3-204 (7)(f)(II) or section 42-4-1208 (3)(a), (3)(a.5), or (4) commits a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a surcharge of thirty-two dollars under sections 24-4.1-119 (1)(f) and 24-4.2-104 (1)(b)(I), and:

A fine of not less than three hundred fifty dollars but not more than one thousand dollars for the first offense;

A fine of not less than six hundred dollars but not more than one thousand dollars for a second offense; and

A fine of not less than one thousand dollars but not more than five thousand dollars, in addition to not more than ten hours of community service, for a third or subsequent offense.

A person who violates section 42-4-1208 (3) by parking a vehicle owned by a commercial carrier is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by the surcharge and a fine of up to twice the penalty imposed in subparagraph (VIII) of this paragraph (a).

A person who violates section 42-4-1208 (5) of this section is guilty of a class 1 misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

A person who willfully receives remuneration for violating section 42-4-1208 (5) is guilty of a class 1 misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by twice the civil and criminal penalties that would be imposed under section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

The schedule in subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) shall not apply when the provisions of paragraph (c) of subsection (5) of this section prohibit the issuance of a penalty assessment notice for a violation of the aforesaid traffic violation.

The schedules in subparagraphs (II) and (III) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) shall apply whether the violator is issued a penalty assessment notice or a summons and complaint.

The penalties and surcharges imposed for speeding violations under subsection (4)(a)(I)(L) of this section shall be doubled if a speeding violation occurs within a maintenance, repair, or construction zone that is designated by the department of transportation pursuant to section 42-4-614 (1)(a); except that the penalty for violating section 42-4-1101 (1) or (8)(b) by twenty to twenty-four miles per hour over the reasonable and prudent speed or over the maximum lawful speed limit of seventy-five miles per hour shall be five hundred forty dollars.

The penalties and surcharges imposed for violations under sub-subparagraphs (C), (G), (H), (I), (J), (K), (N), and (O) of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) shall be doubled if a violation occurs within a maintenance, repair, or construction zone that is designated by the department of transportation pursuant to section 42-4-614 (1)(a); except that the fines for violating sections 42-4-314, 42-4-610, 42-4-613, 42-4-706, 42-4-707, 42-4-708, 42-4-709, 42-4-710, 42-4-1011, 42-4-1012, 42-4-1404, 42-4-1408, and 42-4-1414 shall not be doubled under this subparagraph (II).

There is hereby created, within the highway users tax fund, the highway construction workers' safety account.

If a fine is doubled under subparagraph (I) or (II) of this paragraph (c), one-half of the fine allocated to the state by sections 42-1-217 and 43-4-205, C.R.S., shall be transferred to the state treasurer, who shall deposit it in the highway construction workers' safety account within the highway users tax fund to be continuously appropriated to the department of transportation for work zone safety equipment, signs, and law enforcement.

This subparagraph (II) is effective July 1, 2006.

The penalties and surcharges imposed for speeding violations under sub-subparagraph (L) of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) shall be doubled if a speeding violation occurs within a maintenance, repair, or construction zone that is designated by a public entity pursuant to section 42-4-614 (1)(b).

The penalties and surcharges imposed for violations under sub-subparagraphs (C), (G), (H), (I), (J), (K), (N), and (O) of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) shall be doubled if a violation occurs within a maintenance, repair, or construction zone that is designated by a public entity pursuant to section 42-4-614 (1)(b); except that the fines for violating sections 42-4-314, 42-4-610, 42-4-613, 42-4-706, 42-4-707, 42-4-708, 42-4-709, 42-4-710, 42-4-1011, 42-4-1012, 42-4-1404, 42-4-1408, and 42-4-1414 shall not be doubled under this subparagraph (IV).

The penalty and surcharge imposed for any moving traffic violation under subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) are doubled if the violation occurs within a school zone pursuant to section 42-4-615.

The penalty and surcharge imposed for any moving traffic violation under subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) are doubled if the violation occurs within a wildlife crossing zone pursuant to section 42-4-616.

There is hereby created, within the highway users tax fund, the wildlife crossing zones safety account.

If a penalty and surcharge are doubled pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (d.5), one-half of the penalty and surcharge allocated to the state by sections 42-1-217 and 43-4-205, C.R.S., shall be transferred to the state treasurer, who shall deposit the moneys in the wildlife crossing zones safety account within the highway users tax fund to be continuously appropriated to the department of transportation for wildlife crossing zones signs and law enforcement.

An additional twenty dollars shall be assessed for speeding violations pursuant to subsection (4)(a)(I)(L) of this section in addition to the penalties and surcharge stated in subsection (4)(a)(I)(L) of this section. Money collected pursuant to this subsection (4)(e) must be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall deposit such money in the Colorado brain injury trust fund created pursuant to section 26-1-309 within fourteen days after the end of each quarter, to be used for the purposes set forth in part 3 of article 1 of title 26.

If the surcharge is collected by a county, the surcharge shall be twenty-two dollars, of which two dollars shall be retained by the county and the remaining twenty dollars must be transmitted to the state treasurer and credited to the Colorado brain injury trust fund created pursuant to section 26-1-309 within fourteen days after the end of each quarter, to be used for the purposes set forth in part 3 of article 1 of title 26.

An additional twenty dollars is assessed for a violation of a traffic regulation pursuant to subsection (4)(a)(I)(C) of this section for a violation of section 42-4-109 (13)(b), in addition to the penalties stated in subsection (4)(a)(I)(C) of this section. An additional twenty dollars must be assessed for a motorcycle violation pursuant to subsection (4)(a)(I)(O) of this section for a violation of section 42-4-1502 (4.5), in addition to the penalties stated in subsection (4)(a)(I)(O) of this section. Money collected pursuant to this subsection (4)(e)(III) must be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall deposit the money in the Colorado brain injury trust fund created pursuant to section 26-1-309, to be used for the purposes set forth in part 3 of article 1 of title 26.

In addition to the surcharge specified in sub-subparagraph (N) of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (4), the court shall assess a surcharge of five dollars for a violation of section 42-4-1301 (2)(d). Moneys collected pursuant to this paragraph (f) must be transmitted to the state treasurer who shall deposit such moneys in the rural alcohol and substance abuse cash fund created in section 27-80-117 (3), C.R.S., within fourteen days after the end of each quarter, to be used for the purposes set forth in section 27-80-117, C.R.S.

If the additional surcharge is collected by a county court, the additional surcharge shall be six dollars of which one dollar shall be retained by the county and the remaining five dollars shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and credited to the rural alcohol and substance abuse cash fund created in section 27-80-117 (3), C.R.S., within fourteen days after the end of each quarter, to be used for the purposes set forth in section 27-80-117, C.R.S.

This paragraph (f) is repealed, effective September 1, 2025, unless the general assembly extends the repeal of the rural alcohol and substance abuse prevention and treatment program created in section 27-80-117.

At the time that any person is arrested for the commission of any misdemeanors, petty offenses, or misdemeanor traffic offenses set forth in subsection (4) of this section, the arresting officer may, except when the provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection (5) prohibit it, offer to give a penalty assessment notice to the defendant. At any time that a person is charged with the commission of any traffic infraction, the peace officer shall, except when the provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection (5) prohibit it, give a penalty assessment notice to the defendant. Such penalty assessment notice shall contain all the information required by section

42-4-1707 (3)

or by section

42-4-1709

, whichever is applicable. The fine or penalty specified in subsection (4) of this section for the violation charged and the surcharge thereon may be paid at the office of the department of revenue, either in person or by postmarking such payment within twenty days from the date the penalty assessment notice is served upon the defendant; except that the fine or penalty charged and the surcharge thereon shall be paid to the county if it relates to a traffic offense authorized by county ordinance. The department of revenue shall accept late payment of any penalty assessment up to twenty days after such payment becomes due. Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a), in the case of an offense other than a traffic infraction, a defendant who otherwise would be eligible to be issued a penalty assessment notice but who does not furnish satisfactory evidence of identity or who the officer has reasonable and probable grounds to believe will disregard the summons portion of such notice may be issued a penalty assessment notice if the defendant consents to be taken by the officer to the nearest mailbox and to mail the amount of the fine or penalty and surcharge thereon to the department. The peace officer shall advise the person arrested or cited of the points to be assessed in accordance with section

42-2-127

. Except as otherwise provided in section

42-4-1710 (1)(b)

, acceptance of a penalty assessment notice and payment of the prescribed fine or penalty and surcharge thereon to the department shall be deemed a complete satisfaction for the violation, and the defendant shall be given a receipt which so states when such fine or penalty and surcharge thereon is paid in currency or other form of legal tender. Checks tendered by the defendant to and accepted by the department and on which payment is received by the department shall be deemed sufficient receipt.
(5) (a) (I) At the time that any person is arrested for the commission of any misdemeanors, petty offenses, or misdemeanor traffic offenses set forth in subsection (4) of this section, the arresting officer may, except when the provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection (5) prohibit it, offer to give a penalty assessment notice to the defendant. At any time that a person is charged with the commission of any traffic infraction, the peace officer shall, except when the provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection (5) prohibit it, give a penalty assessment notice to the defendant. Such penalty assessment notice shall contain all the information required by section

42-4-1707 (3)

or by section

42-4-1709

, whichever is applicable. The fine or penalty specified in subsection (4) of this section for the violation charged and the surcharge thereon may be paid at the office of the department of revenue, either in person or by postmarking such payment within twenty days from the date the penalty assessment notice is served upon the defendant; except that the fine or penalty charged and the surcharge thereon shall be paid to the county if it relates to a traffic offense authorized by county ordinance. The department of revenue shall accept late payment of any penalty assessment up to twenty days after such payment becomes due. Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a), in the case of an offense other than a traffic infraction, a defendant who otherwise would be eligible to be issued a penalty assessment notice but who does not furnish satisfactory evidence of identity or who the officer has reasonable and probable grounds to believe will disregard the summons portion of such notice may be issued a penalty assessment notice if the defendant consents to be taken by the officer to the nearest mailbox and to mail the amount of the fine or penalty and surcharge thereon to the department. The peace officer shall advise the person arrested or cited of the points to be assessed in accordance with section

42-2-127

. Except as otherwise provided in section

42-4-1710 (1)(b)

, acceptance of a penalty assessment notice and payment of the prescribed fine or penalty and surcharge thereon to the department shall be deemed a complete satisfaction for the violation, and the defendant shall be given a receipt which so states when such fine or penalty and surcharge thereon is paid in currency or other form of legal tender. Checks tendered by the defendant to and accepted by the department and on which payment is received by the department shall be deemed sufficient receipt.

In the case of an offense other than a traffic infraction that involves a minor under the age of eighteen years, the officer shall proceed in accordance with the provisions of section

42-4-1706 (2)

or

42-4-1707 (1)(b)

or (3)(a.5). In no case may an officer issue a penalty assessment notice to a minor under the age of eighteen years and require or offer that the minor consent to be taken by the officer to the nearest mailbox to mail the amount of the fine or penalty and surcharge thereon to the department.

In the case of an offense other than a traffic infraction, should the defendant refuse to accept service of the penalty assessment notice when such notice is tendered, the peace officer shall proceed in accordance with section

42-4-1705

or

42-4-1707

. Should the defendant charged with an offense other than a traffic infraction accept service of the penalty assessment notice but fail to post the prescribed penalty and surcharge thereon within twenty days thereafter, the notice shall be construed to be a summons and complaint unless payment for such penalty assessment has been accepted by the department of revenue as evidenced by receipt. Should the defendant charged with a traffic infraction accept the notice but fail to post the prescribed penalty and surcharge thereon within twenty days thereafter, and should the department of revenue not accept payment for such penalty and surcharge as evidenced by receipt, the defendant shall be allowed to pay such penalty and surcharge thereon and the docket fee in the amount set forth in section

42-4-1710 (4)

to the clerk of the court referred to in the summons portion of the penalty assessment notice during the two business days prior to the time for appearance as specified in the notice. If the penalty for a misdemeanor, misdemeanor traffic offense, or a petty offense and surcharge thereon is not timely paid, the case shall thereafter be heard in the court of competent jurisdiction prescribed on the penalty assessment notice in the same manner as is provided by law for prosecutions of the misdemeanors not specified in subsection (4) of this section. If the penalty for a traffic infraction and surcharge thereon is not timely paid, the case shall thereafter be heard in the court of competent jurisdiction prescribed on the penalty assessment notice in the manner provided for in this article for the prosecution of traffic infractions. In either case, the maximum penalty that may be imposed shall not exceed the penalty set forth in the applicable penalty and surcharge schedule in subsection (4) of this section.

The provisions of section 42-4-1710 (1)(b) shall govern any case described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (5) in which a minor under the age of eighteen years submits timely payment for an infraction or offense in a penalty assessment notice but such payment is not accompanied by the penalty assessment notice signed and notarized in the manner required by section

42-4-1707

(3)(a.5) or

42-4-1709

(1.5).

The penalty and surcharge schedules of subsection (4) of this section and the penalty assessment notice provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (5) shall not apply to violations constituting misdemeanors, petty offenses, or misdemeanor traffic offenses not specified in said subsection (4) of this section, nor shall they apply to the violations constituting misdemeanors, petty offenses, misdemeanor traffic offenses, or traffic infractions specified in said subsection (4) of this section when it appears that:

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 96, p. 580

, § 4, effective May 25, 1996.)

In a violation of section

42-4-1101 (1)

or (8)(b), the defendant exceeded the reasonable and prudent speed or the maximum lawful speed of seventy-five miles per hour by more than twenty-four miles per hour;

The alleged violation has caused, or contributed to the cause of, an accident resulting in appreciable damage to property of another or in injury or death to any person;

The defendant has, in the course of the same transaction, violated one of the provisions of this title specified in the penalty and surcharge schedules in subsection (4) of this section and has also violated one or more provisions of this title not so specified, and the peace officer charges such defendant with two or more violations, any one of which is not specified in the penalty and surcharge schedules in subsection (4) of this section.

In all cases where this paragraph (c) prohibits the issuance of a penalty assessment notice, the penalty and surcharge schedule contained in subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of this section shall be inapplicable; except that the penalty and surcharge provided in the schedule contained in sub-subparagraph (B) of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of this section for any violation of section

42-3-121 (1)(a)

shall always apply to such a violation. In all cases where the penalty and surcharge schedule contained in subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of this section is inapplicable, the provisions of subsection (3) of this section shall apply.

In addition to any other cases governed by this section, the penalty and surcharge schedule contained in subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of this section shall apply in the following cases:

In all cases in which a peace officer was authorized by the provisions of this subsection (5) to offer a penalty assessment notice for the commission of a misdemeanor, petty offense, or misdemeanor traffic offense but such peace officer chose not to offer such penalty assessment notice;

In all cases involving the commission of a misdemeanor, petty offense, or misdemeanor traffic offense in which a penalty assessment notice was offered by a peace officer but such penalty assessment notice was refused by the defendant.

An officer coming upon an unattended vehicle that is in apparent violation of any provision of the state motor vehicle law may place upon the vehicle a penalty assessment notice indicating the offense or infraction and directing the owner or operator of the vehicle to remit the penalty assessment provided for by subsection (4) of this section and the surcharges thereon pursuant to sections 24-4.1-119 (1)(f) and 24-4.2-104 (1), C.R.S., to the Colorado department of revenue within ten days. If the penalty assessment and surcharge thereon is not paid within ten days of the issuance of the notice, the department shall mail a notice to the registered owner of the vehicle, setting forth the offense or infraction and the time and place where it occurred and directing the payment of the penalty assessment and surcharge thereon within twenty days from the issuance of the notice. If the penalty assessment and surcharge thereon is not paid within the twenty days from the date of mailing of such notice, the department shall request the police officer who issued the original penalty assessment notice to file a complaint with a court having jurisdiction and issue and serve upon the registered owner of the vehicle a summons to appear in court at a time and place specified therein as in the case of other offenses or infractions.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection (5) of this section, receipt of payment by mail by the department or postmarking such payment on or prior to the twentieth day after the receipt of the penalty assessment notice by the defendant shall be deemed to constitute receipt on or before the date the payment was due.

The surcharges described in subsections (4) to (6) of this section are separate and distinct from a surcharge levied pursuant to section 24-33.5-415.6, C.R.S.

Class

Minimum

Maximum

Penalty

Penalty

A
$15 penalty
$100 penalty
B
$15 penalty
$100 penalty

Class

Minimum

Maximum

Sentence

Sentence

1
Ten days imprisonment,
One year imprisonment,
or $300 fine, or both
or $1,000 fine, or both
2
Ten days imprisonment,
Ninety days imprisonment,
or $150 fine, or both
or $300 fine, or both

Click to view table

Click to view table

Click to view table

Click to view table

Click to view table

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2406, § 1, effective January 1, 1995; (3)(a)(I), (4)(a)(I), and (4)(a)(IV)(A) amended, p. 683, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1), (4)(a)(I)(A), (4)(a)(I)(D), and (4)(a)(I)(M) amended, p. 958, § 18, effective May 25.

L. 96:

(4)(a)(I)(F) amended, p. 278, § 2, effective April 11; (4)(a)(I)(F) amended, p. 385, § 2, effective April 17; (4)(a)(I)(I) amended, p. 565, § 30, effective April 24; (5)(a) and (6) amended, p. 638, § 4, effective May 1; (4)(a)(I)(L), (5)(c)(I)(A), and (5)(c)(I)(B) amended, p. 580, § 4, effective May 25; (4)(a)(I)(D) amended, p. 959, § 6, effective July 1; (4)(a)(I)(K) amended, p. 1358, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(4)(a)(I)(N) amended, p. 1468, § 14, effective July 1; (4)(c) added, p. 1386, § 6, effective July 1; (4)(a)(I)(G) amended, p. 498, § 3, effective August 6; (4)(a)(I)(B) amended, p. 1074, § 6, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 98:

(4)(a)(I)(B) amended, p. 1019, § 4, effective May 27; (4)(d) added, p. 589, § 2, effective July 1; (4)(a)(I)(K) amended, p. 1206, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 99:

(4)(a)(I)(N) amended, p. 666, § 3, effective May 18; (4)(a)(I)(A) amended, p. 1381, § 6, effective July 1; (4)(a)(I)(M) amended, p. 712, § 4, effective July 1; (4)(a)(I)(B) amended, p. 631, § 48, effective August 4; (5)(a) amended, p. 368, § 5, effective August 4.

L. 2000:

(5)(a), (5)(b), and (6) amended, p. 1643, § 31, effective June 1; (4)(a)(I)(D) amended, p. 1100, § 2, effective August 2; (3)(a)(II)(B) amended, p. 1051, § 22, effective September 1.

L. 2002:

IP(3)(a)(II)(A) amended, p. 1923, § 21, effective July 1; (4)(a)(VI) added, p. 631, § 3, effective July 1; (3)(a)(II)(B) amended, p. 1562, § 370, effective October 1; (4)(e) added, p. 1610, § 5, effective January 1, 2004.

L. 2003:

(4)(a)(I), (4)(a)(II), and (4)(a)(III)(A) amended, p. 1545, § 8, effective May 1.

L. 2004:

(4)(a)(I)(N) amended, p. 241, § 2, effective July 1; (5)(a) amended and (5)(b.5) added, p. 1331, § 2, effective July 1, 2005.

L. 2005:

(4)(a)(VI)(B) repealed, p. 1004, § 3, effective June 2; (4)(a)(I)(N) amended, p. 1188, § 2, effective July 1; (4)(a)(I)(B), (4)(a)(IV), and (5)(c)(II) amended, p. 1177, § 19, effective August 8; (4)(a)(I)(D) amended, p. 268, § 3, effective August 8; (4)(c) amended, p. 1221, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(4)(a)(I)(G) amended, p. 1712, § 2, effective June 6; (4)(a)(I)(A) amended, p. 439, § 4, effective July 1; (4)(a)(I)(N) amended and (4)(a)(VII) added, p. 1064, § 4, effective July 1; (4)(a)(I)(A) amended, p. 1370 § 10, effective January 1, 2007.

L. 2007:

(4)(a)(I), (4)(a)(II), (4)(a)(III)(A), (4)(a)(IV)(A), and (6) amended, p. 1114, § 5, effective July 1; (4)(a)(I)(C) and (4)(a)(I)(O) amended and (4)(e)(III) added, pp. 1481, 1482, §§ 3, 4, effective July 1; (4)(a)(I)(F) amended, p. 1333, § 3, effective August 3.

L. 2008:

IP(4)(a)(III) and (4)(a)(III)(A) amended and (4)(a)(III)(D) added, p. 2094, § 3, effective June 3; (4)(c) amended, p. 2079, § 3, effective June 3; (3)(a)(II)(A) amended, p. 252, § 20, effective July 1; (3)(a)(II)(A), (4)(a)(I)(A), (4)(a)(I)(C), (4)(a)(I)(D) and (4)(a)(I)(G) to (4)(a)(I)(O) amended, p. 2087, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(8) added, (SB 09-241), ch. 295, p. 1579, § 6, effective July 1; (4)(e) amended, (SB 09-133), ch. 392, p. 2120, § 3, effective August 5; (4)(a)(I)(L) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1283, § 64, effective October 1; (4)(a)(I)(P) amended, (HB 09-1094), ch. 375, p. 2045, § 2, effective December 1; (4)(f) added, (HB 09-1119), ch. 397, p. 2146, § 4, effective January 1, 2010.

L. 2010:

(4)(f) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 809, § 88, effective April 29; (4)(a)(II) amended, (HB 10-1285), ch. 423, p. 2188, § 3, effective July 1; (4)(d.5) added, (HB 10-1238), ch. 393, p. 1869, § 3, effective September 1; (3)(a)(I), (3)(a)(II)(A), IP(4)(a)(I), and (4)(a)(I)(M) amended, (HB 10-1019), ch. 400, pp. 1931, 1930, §§ 8, 5, effective January 1, 2011.

L. 2011:

(3)(a)(II)(A) amended, (HB 11-1268), ch. 267, p. 1220, § 4, effective June 2; IP(3)(a)(II)(A) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1183, § 113, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(4)(a)(I)(N) amended, (SB 12-044), ch. 274, p. 1447, § 2, effective June 8.

L. 2014:

(4)(a)(I)(N) amended, (HB 14-1363), ch. 302, p. 1276, § 48, effective May 31; IP(4)(a)(I) and (4)(a)(I)(M) amended and (4)(a)(VIII), (4)(a)(IX), and (4)(a)(X) added, (HB 14-1029), ch. 252, p. 1005, § 5, effective July 1; IP(4)(a)(I) and (4)(a)(I)(F) amended, (HB 14-1021), ch. 188, p. 703, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2015:

(4)(a)(I)(N) and (4)(f)(I) amended, (HB 15-1043), ch. 262, p. 997, § 7, effective August 5; (4)(a)(X)(B) amended, (SB 15-264), ch. 259, p. 969, § 96, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(4)(a)(II)(A) and (4)(a)(III)(A) amended, (SB 16-030), ch. 298, p. 1210, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

IP(4)(a)(I), (4)(a)(I)(N), and (4)(f)(III) amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1415, § 112, effective May 25; IP(4)(a)(I) and (4)(a)(I)(P) amended, (SB 17-027), ch. 279, p. 1524, § 3, effective June 1; IP(4)(a)(I) and (4)(a)(I)(N) amended, (SB 17-278), ch. 323, p. 1743, § 2, effective June 5; (4)(e) amended, (SB 17-234), ch. 154, p. 525, § 20, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

IP(4)(a)(VIII) amended, (HB 18-1285), ch. 265, p. 1630, § 5, effective January 1, 2019.

L. 2019:

(4)(a)(I)(M) amended, (HB 19-1298), ch. 384, p. 3440, § 4, effective August 2; (4)(e) amended, (HB 19-1147), ch. 178, p. 2034, § 16, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(4)(a)(I)(H) amended, (SB 20-061), ch. 30, p. 102, § 4, effective July 1.

42-4-1702. Alcohol- or drug-related traffic offenses - collateral attack.

No person against whom a judgment has been entered for DUI, DUI per se, DWAI, or UDD shall collaterally attack the validity of that judgment unless such attack is commenced within six months after the date of entry of the judgment.

In recognition of the difficulties attending the litigation of stale claims and the potential for frustrating various statutory provisions directed at repeat offenders, former offenders, and habitual offenders, the only exceptions to the time limitations specified in subsection (1)(a) of this section are:

A case in which the court entering judgment did not have jurisdiction over the subject matter of the alleged infraction;

A case in which the court entering judgment did not have jurisdiction over the person of the violator;

Where the court hearing the collateral attack finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the failure to seek relief within the applicable time period was caused by an adjudication of incompetence or by commitment or certification of the violator to an institution for treatment as a person with a mental health disorder; or

Where the court hearing the collateral attack finds that the failure to seek relief within the applicable time period was the result of circumstances amounting to justifiable excuse or excusable neglect.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2417, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2006:

(2)(c) amended, p. 1409, § 80, effective August 7.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 253, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (HB 13-1325), ch. 331, p. 1886, § 16, effective May 28.

L. 2017:

IP(2) and (2)(c) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1381, § 307, effective May 25.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1501.5 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1702 was relocated to § 43-5-502.

Cross references:

(1) For provisions concerning limitation for collateral attack upon trial judgment, see § 16-5-402.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

42-4-1703. Parties to a crime.

Every person who commits, conspires to commit, or aids or abets in the commission of any act declared in this article and part 1 of article 2 of this title to be a crime or traffic infraction, whether individually or in connection with one or more other persons or as principal, agent, or accessory, is guilty of such offense or liable for such infraction, and every person who falsely, fraudulently, forcibly, or willfully induces, causes, coerces, requires, permits, or directs another to violate any provision of this article is likewise guilty of such offense or liable for such infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2418, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1502 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1703 was relocated to § 43-5-503.